Maryland, session 2025, SB0939.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
12–102.
This title applies only in Baltimore City.
– 1 –

Ch. 811 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
12–1311.
(a) The Board shall set the license fee for a Class C per diem beer license and a
Class C per diem beer and wine license.
(b) (1) The Board shall set the license fee for a Class C per diem beer, wine,
and liquor license.
(2) The Board may collect from the license holder reimbursement for costs
incurred while monitoring the event for which the license is issued.
(C) THE BOARD SHALL IMPOSE A FEE OF NOT MORE THAN $250 FOR
EXPEDITED PROCESSING OF A PER DIEM LICENSE APPLICATION IF THE
APPLICATION IS SUBMITTED LESS THAN 2 WEEKS BEFORE THE SCHEDULED EVENT
REQUIRING THE PER DIEM LICENSE.
12–1314.
(A) THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS RELATING TO THE
APPLICATION PROCESS FOR CLASS C PER DIEM LICENSES ISSUED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH §§ 4–1203 AND 4–1204 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE BOARD UNDER THIS SECTION MAY
AUTHORIZE THE BOARD TO:
(1) DENY OR REVOKE A CLASS C PER DIEM LICENSE; OR
(2) LIMIT THE NUMBER OF CLASS C PER DIEM LICENSES THAT MAY
BE ISSUED TO A PERSON FOR THE SAME LOCATION WITHIN A CALENDAR YEAR.
12–1603.
(a) The alcoholic beverages districts described in this section at all times are
coterminous with the legislative districts in the Legislative Districting Plan of 2022.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the Board may not issue a
new license in:
(1) the 40th alcoholic beverages district;
(2) the 41st alcoholic beverages district;
(3) the 43rd alcoholic beverages district;
(4) the 44th alcoholic beverages district; and
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 811
(5) the 45th alcoholic beverages district.
(c) The Board may issue:
(1) in the alcoholic beverages districts specified in subsection (b) of this
section:
(ii) a Class B beer, wine, and liquor license to a restaurant that:
1. has a minimum capital investment, not including the cost
of land and buildings, of $200,000 for restaurant facilities; and
2. has a minimum seating capacity of 75 individuals;
(17) a Class A–7 beer, wine, and liquor license in the 1200 block of West
North Avenue in the 40th alcoholic beverages district, if:
(i) the applicant executes a memorandum of understanding with the
Penn North Community Association;
(ii) alcoholic beverages are sold only as part of a gift basket or floral
arrangement; and
(iii) the applicant does not hold or apply for a Class BWLT beer, wine,
and liquor (on–premises) tasting license; [and]
(18) a Class B beer, wine, and liquor license for a restaurant on the even
side of the 400 block of West 29th Street in the 40th alcoholic beverages district if:
(i) the applicant executes a memorandum of understanding with the
Greater Remington Improvement Association; and
(ii) the Board waives a minimum seating requirement under item
(1)(ii)2 of this subsection;
(19) A CLASS C BEER AND LIGHT WINE LICENSE IN THE 2500 BLOCK OF
WEST NORTH AVENUE IN THE 40TH ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES DISTRICT TO BE USED
DURING ON–CAMPUS EVENTS IF:
(I) THE APPLICANT EXECUTES A MEMORANDUM OF
UNDERSTANDING WITH THE GREATER MONDAWMIN COORDINATING COUNCIL; AND
(II) THE BOARD WAIVES ANY REQUIREMENTS THAT SALES CAN
BE MADE ONLY TO MEMBERS AND THE GUESTS OF MEMBERS;
– 3 –

Ch. 811 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(20) A CLASS C BEER AND WINE LICENSE ON THE ODD SIDE OF THE 800
BLOCK OF NORTH HOWARD STREET IN THE 40TH ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES DISTRICT
IF:
(I) THE APPLICANT DOES NOT CONVERT THE LICENSE TO A
DIFFERENT LICENSE CLASS;
(II) THE APPLICANT DOES NOT TRANSFER THE LICENSE TO A
DIFFERENT LOCATION;
(III) ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES ARE SERVED ONLY TO PATRONS
INDOORS;
(IV) ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES SALES BEGIN NOT EARLIER THAN
10 A.M. AND END NOT LATER THAN 9 P.M.;
(V) THE APPLICANT PROVIDES NOT MORE THAN TWO 12–OUNCE
OFFERINGS OF BEER OR TWO 6–OUNCE OFFERINGS OF WINE BY THE GLASS FOR
ON–PREMISES CONSUMPTION BY A PATRON WHILE THE PATRON IS PROVIDED A
BARBERING SERVICE REGULATED UNDER TITLE 4, SUBTITLE 5 OF THE BUSINESS
OCCUPATIONS AND PROFESSIONS ARTICLE;
(VI) THE BOARD WAIVES ANY REQUIREMENTS THAT SALES CAN
BE MADE ONLY TO MEMBERS AND THE GUESTS OF MEMBERS; AND
(VII) THE APPLICANT EXECUTES A MEMORANDUM OF
UNDERSTANDING WITH THE MOUNT VERNON – BELVEDERE ASSOCIATION; AND
(21) A CLASS B BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE FOR A RESTAURANT
ON THE EVEN SIDE OF THE 1100 BLOCK OF HOLLINS STREET IN THE 40TH
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES DISTRICT IF:
(I) THE APPLICANT EXECUTES A MEMORANDUM OF
UNDERSTANDING WITH THE HOLLINS ROUNDHOUSE ASSOCIATION; AND
(II) THE BOARD WAIVES THE MINIMUM SEATING REQUIREMENT
UNDER ITEM (1)(II)2 OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(22) A CLASS B BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE FOR A RESTAURANT
ON THE EVEN SIDE OF THE UNIT BLOCK OF SOUTH CARROLLTON AVENUE IN THE
40TH ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES DISTRICT IF:
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 811
(I) THE APPLICANT EXECUTES A MEMORANDUM OF
UNDERSTANDING WITH THE HOLLINS ROUNDHOUSE ASSOCIATION; AND
(II) THE BOARD WAIVES THE MINIMUM SEATING REQUIREMENT
UNDER ITEM (1)(II)2 OF THIS SUBSECTION.
12–2005.
(d) (1) This subsection does not apply to:
(i) a Class B beer and light wine (restaurant) license;
(ii) a Class B beer, wine, and liquor (restaurant) license issued under
§ 12–1603(c)(1)(ii) of this title;
(iii) a Class B–BWL (H–M) license;
(iv) a Class C beer and wine license;
(v) a Class C beer, wine, and liquor license;
(vi) an arena license; [or]
(vii) a marketplace license; OR
(VIII) A CLASS M–F (MUNICIPAL FAMILY FUN CENTER) LICENSE.
(2) For a license holder in the 40th alcoholic beverages district, the hours
of sale for alcoholic beverages may not begin before 10 a.m. or end after 10 p.m.:
(i) within an area bounded:
1. from the intersection of Reisterstown Road and Quantico
Avenue, northwest on Reisterstown Road to the intersection with Wylie Avenue, northeast
on Wylie Avenue to the intersection with Pimlico Road, northwest on Pimlico Road to the
intersection with Dupont Avenue, east on Dupont Avenue to the intersection with Pall Mall
Road, southeast on Pall Mall Road to the intersection with Edgecombe Circle North, east
on Edgecombe Circle North to the intersection with Finney Avenue, south on Finney
Avenue to the intersection with Oakford Avenue, west on Oakford Avenue to the
intersection with Pall Mall Road, southeast on Pall Mall Road to the intersection with
Loyola Northway, southwest on Loyola Northway to the intersection with Pimlico Road,
southeast on Pimlico Road to the intersection with Quantico Avenue, and southwest on
Quantico Avenue to the intersection with Reisterstown Road; and
2. from the intersection of Millington Avenue with Wilkens
Avenue, northwest on Millington Avenue to the intersection with Frederick Avenue,
– 5 –

Ch. 811 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
northeast on Frederick Avenue to the intersection with West Pratt Street, east on West
Pratt Street to the intersection with South Mount Street, south on South Mount Street to
the intersection with Eagle Street, southwest on Eagle Street to the intersection with South
Smallwood Street, northwest on South Smallwood Street to the intersection with Wilkens
Avenue, and southwest on Wilkens Avenue to the intersection with Millington Avenue;
(ii) within the area of West North Avenue between the 1000 block of
West North Avenue and the 3200 block of West North Avenue, inclusive; [and]
(iii) for a license holder within 250 yards in any direction of the area
described in item (ii) of this paragraph; AND
(IV) WITHIN AN AREA BOUNDED AS FOLLOWS: FROM THE
INTERSECTION OF NORTH FULTON AVENUE WITH NORTH AVENUE, NORTH ON
NORTH FULTON AVENUE TO THE INTERSECTION WITH PENNSYLVANIA AVENUE,
NORTHEAST ON NORTH FULTON AVENUE TO THE INTERSECTION WITH DRUID HILL
AVENUE, SOUTHEAST ON DRUID HILL AVENUE TO THE INTERSECTION WITH
MOSHER STREET, SOUTHWEST ON MOSHER STREET TO THE INTERSECTION WITH
NORTH CAREY STREET, NORTH ON NORTH CAREY STREET TO THE INTERSECTION
WITH NORTH AVENUE, AND WEST ON NORTH AVENUE TO THE INTERSECTION WITH
NORTH FULTON AVENUE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 6 –